Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB105.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.307 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Dysgraphia" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.305;
(b) "Dyslexia" means a specific learning disability that is neurological in origin. It
is characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by
poor spelling and decoding abilities. These difficulties typically result from a
deficit in the phonological component of language that is often unexpected in
relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom
instruction. Secondary consequences may include problems in reading
comprehension and reduced reading experience that can impede the growth of
vocabulary and background knowledge;
(c)[(b)] "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 7801(21);
and
(d)[(c)] "Phonemic awareness" means the ability to recognize that a spoken
word consists of a sequence of individual sounds and the ability to manipulate
individual sounds in speaking.
(2) [By January 1, 2019, ]The Department of Education shall make available a dyslexia
toolkit that includes guidance, technical assistance, and training to assist all local
school districts in the implementation of evidence-based practices for instructing
students identified with or displaying characteristics of dyslexia or dysgraphia. The
department shall annually review and update, where appropriate, the dyslexia
toolkit guidance identified in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The dyslexia toolkit shall include but not be limited to the following guidance for
local districts targeting students in kindergarten through grade three (3) who have
been identified with or displaying characteristics of dyslexia or dysgraphia:
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1726
(a) Definitions and characteristics of dyslexia and dysgraphia;
(b) Recommended procedures for the screening, identification, and ongoing
monitoring of students displaying characteristics of dyslexia or dysgraphia;
(c) Evidence-based practices designed specifically for students with dyslexia or
dysgraphia;
(d) A description of educational strategies within a multitiered system of
supports that have been shown to improve the academic performance of
students with dyslexia or dysgraphia[(b) Characteristics of targeted
instruction for dyslexia];
(e)[(c)] Guidance on developing instructional plans for students with dyslexia or
dysgraphia, including instructional tools identified in KRS 158.305(12)(b);
(f)[(d)] Best practices toward meaning-centered reading and writing;
(g)[(e)] Structured multisensory and literacy approaches to teaching language
and reading skills;[ and]
(h)[(f)] Suggested professional development activities;
(i) A description of resources and services available to students with dyslexia or
dysgraphia, parents or guardians of students with dyslexia or dysgraphia,
and teachers; and
(j) Guidelines on the administration of an approved universal screener and
diagnostic, the interpretation of data, and the resulting appropriate
instruction within a multitiered system of support.
(4) The department shall collaborate with the Education Professional Standards Board,
Council on Postsecondary Education, and other groups as necessary to improve and
update professional development opportunities for teachers specifically related to
dyslexia. Professional development opportunities may focus on:
(a) Development and ongoing implementation of training and coaching for
teachers;
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1726
(b) Identifying opportunities to[high-quality trainers to provide] support[ to] local
districts utilizing a coaching model to develop building level
capacity[dyslexia experts];
(c) Developing awareness training modules for all instructional staff to include
information about characteristics of dyslexia or dysgraphia; and
(d) Evidence-based interventions, structured multisensory and literacy approaches
to teach language and reading skills[, and accommodations for dyslexia and
other specific learning disabilities].
(5) Each local board of education shall[may] develop a policy addressing the
implementation of a program for the identification of and strategies for assisting
students in kindergarten through grade three (3) with dyslexia.
(6) The local board policies shall[may] include but not be limited to:
(a) The definition and characteristics of dyslexia;
(b) A process for identifying students who are displaying characteristics of
dyslexia;
(c) A process for the utilization of a universal screener and
diagnostic[evaluation] tools, approved by the department pursuant to KRS
158.305(5)(a), to accurately identify students who are displaying
characteristics of dyslexia. Any universal screener and diagnostic[qualified
dyslexia evaluation] tool utilized by a local district shall address but not be
limited to the following components:
1. Phonological awareness and phonemic awareness;
2. Sound symbol recognition;
3. Alphabet knowledge;
4. Decoding skills;
5. Encoding skills; and
6. Rapid naming;
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1726
(d) A process for how the universal screener and diagnostic[evaluation] tools,
approved by the department pursuant to KRS 158.305(5)(a), are
administered and evaluated by trained district personnel or licensed
professionals;
(e) A process for outreach to parents of students identified with or displaying the
characteristics of dyslexia with information and resource materials and how
dyslexia may be addressed in the student's educational setting;
(f) Identification of evidence-based interventions, structured multisensory and
literacy approaches to teach language and reading skills, and accommodations
that schools may utilize to provide services to students identified as having
dyslexia; and
(g) A process for monitoring a student's progress[ after the positive
identification], including assessments to ascertain whether the intervention
services improve the student's language processing and reading skills.
(7) Each district shall use evidence-based instructional strategies within a multitiered
system of support to provide intervention services to students who display
indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia. In order to provide
school districts with the opportunity to intervene before a student's performance
falls significantly below grade level, schools shall screen all students in
accordance with KRS 158.305. Intervention services shall utilize structured
literacy practices that specifically target areas of weakness and:
(a) Provide explicit, systematic, sequential, and cumulative instruction that
adheres to a logical plan about the alphabetic principle and is designed to
accommodate the needs of each individual student without presuming prior
skills or knowledge;
(b) Implement evidence-based practices that have been proven effective and do
not include the three-cueing system model of word reading;
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1726
(c) Engage the student in multisensory/multimodal language learning
techniques;
(d) Include phonemic awareness activities to enable the student to detect,
segment, blend, and manipulate sounds in the spoken language;
(e) Provide graphophonemic knowledge for teaching the letter sound plan of
the English language;
(f) Teach the structure and patterns of the English language, including
linguistic instruction in morphology, semantics, syntax, and pragmatics,
that is directed toward proficiency and fluency with the patterns of language
so that words and sentences are the carriers of meaning;
(g) Develop strategies that advance the student's ability in decoding, encoding,
word recognition, fluency, and comprehension; and
(h) Provide meaning-based instruction directed at purposeful reading and
writing, with an emphasis on comprehension and composition.
(8) If the universal screener and diagnostic tool indicates that a student has risk
factors displaying indications of dyslexia, or areas of weakness associated with
dyslexia, the school shall use a multitiered system of supports to address the
needs of the student.
(9) If the student's performance on a universal screener and diagnostic indicates a
need for intervention services, the district shall:
(a) Notify the student's parents or guardian of the results of all screenings; and
(b) Provide the student's parent or guardian with information and resource
material that include the following:
1. The characteristics of dyslexia;
2. The appropriate classroom interventions and accommodations for
students within a multitiered system of supports; and
3. If after receiving interventions, further screening tools and resources
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1726
indicate that a student continues to demonstrate characteristics of
dyslexia and has not made progress toward proficient performance in
reading, the school district shall consider a referral for an evaluation
to determine if the student needs special education and related
services.
(10) Whenever practicable, a school district shall begin by providing student supports
in the general education classroom to ensure access to appropriate grade-level
learning. If screening tools and resources indicate that, after receiving the initial
tier of student support, a student requires interventions, the school district may
provide the interventions in either the general education classroom or in an
enrichment program as defined in KRS 158.305.
(11) Beginning June 30, 2028, and each year thereafter for five (5) years[By June 30
of each year], each local school district [that developed a policy addressing the
implementation of a program for the identification of and strategies for assisting
students in kindergarten through grade three (3) with dyslexia ]shall provide the
department the following data[ for the current school year]:
(a) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
identified through the approved universal screener and diagnostic tool as
displaying characteristics of dyslexia;
(b) The number of students in paragraph (a) of this subsection that were identified
as needing enrichment programming as defined in KRS 158.305[through the
response-to-intervention process;
(c) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
evaluated for dyslexia;
(d) The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that were
identified with dyslexia;
(e) The dyslexia evaluation tools used to identify students];
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1726
(c)[(f)] The number of students in kindergarten through grade three (3) that
were participating in literacy interventions within the school setting; and
(d)[(g)] The process or tools used to evaluate student progress[; and
(h) The number of trained district personnel or licensed professionals used to
administer the dyslexia evaluation tools.
(8) (a) The department shall establish a study project to gather information on early
screening and intervention services for children with characteristics of
dyslexia. The commissioner of education shall select three (3) school districts
to participate in the study project, one (1) of which shall be located in an
urban setting, one (1) of which shall be located in a suburban setting, and one
(1) of which shall be located in a rural setting.
(b) The department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the study
project.
(c) The study project shall operate for three (3) full school years, beginning with
the school year that begins at least three (3) months after July 14, 2018.
(d) The goal of the study project shall be to evaluate the effectiveness of early
reading assistance programs for children with characteristics of dyslexia.
(e) The commissioner may consult with recognized organizations that specialize
in structured literacy programs for the treatment of dyslexia in establishing
and operating the study project.
(f) The department shall submit a final report outlining the findings of the study
to the Interim Joint Committee on Education by November 1 after the final
academic year of the study project].
Section 2. KRS 164.304 is amended to read as follows:
By the 2027-2028[2019-2020] academic year, postsecondary institutions offering teacher
preparation programs for elementary and secondary regular education shall[, subject to
available funds,] include instruction on:
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1726
(1) The definition and characteristics of dyslexia;
(2) Processes for identifying dyslexia;
(3) Evidence-based interventions and accommodations for dyslexia and other disorders
defined in KRS 158.305 and related literacy and learning challenges; and
(4) Core elements of a response-to-intervention framework addressing reading, writing,
mathematics, and behavior, including;
(a) Universal screening;
(b) Evidence-based research interventions;
(c) Progress monitoring of the effectiveness of interventions on student
performance;
(d) Data-based decision-making procedures related to:
1. Determining intervention effectiveness on student performance; and
2. Determining the need to continue, alter, or discontinue interventions or
conduct further evaluation of student needs; and
(e) Application and implementation of a multitiered system of
supports[response-to-intervention] and dyslexia instructional practices in the
classroom setting.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 1/14/2026 8:07 AM Jacketed